Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 20.
STATE BONDS.

Bonds prohibited except when approved by majority vote of electors. —

Except for the purpose of refunding the existing outstanding indebtedness of the State and for assuming and refunding valid outstanding road improvement district bonds, the State of Arkansas shall issue no bonds or other evidence of indebtedness pledging the faith and credit of the State or any of its revenues for any purpose whatsoever, except by and with the consent of the majority of the qualified electors of the State voting on the question at a general election or at a special election called for that purpose.

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment may be superseded by Ark. Const. Amend. 65.

This amendment was proposed by the General Assembly at the 1933 regular session (see Acts 1933, p. 879). It was approved at the general election Nov. 6, 1934, by a vote of 97,344 for and 26,299 against.

Amendment 20 provides that it “shall be self-executing and require no enabling act, but shall take and have full force and effect immediately upon its adoption by the electors of the State.”